Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.190

Initial meeting of zoo and aquarium advisory authority—Expenditure of funds—Powers.

(1) Upon certification by the county auditor or, in the case of a home rule county, upon certification by the chief elections officer, that a proposition authorized under the terms of RCW 82.14.400 has received a majority of votes cast on the proposition, the county legislative authority shall convene an initial meeting of the zoo and aquarium advisory authority.

(2) Consistent with any agreement between the local governments specified in RCW 82.14.400(1) in requesting an election, the zoo and aquarium advisory authority has authority to expend such funds as it may receive on those purposes set out in RCW 82.14.400(4). In addition, and consistent with any limitation placed on the powers of the authority in such an agreement, the zoo and aquarium advisory authority may exercise the following powers:

(a) Acquire by purchase, gift, or grant and lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate, and regulate the use of any zoo, aquarium, and wildlife preservation and display facilities and properties, together with all lands, rights-of-way, property, equipment, and accessories necessary for those facilities;

(b) Contract with the United States or any agency thereof, any state or agency thereof, any metropolitan municipal corporation, any other county, city, special district, or governmental agency, and any private person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of receiving gifts or grants or securing loans or advances for preliminary planning and feasibility studies, or for the design, construction, operation, or maintenance of zoo, aquarium, and wildlife preservation and display facilities;

(c) Contract with any governmental agency or with a private person, firm, or corporation for the use by either contracting party of all or any part of the facilities, structures, lands, interests in lands, air rights over lands, and rights-of-way of all kinds which are owned, leased, or held by the other party, and for the purpose of planning, constructing, or operating any facility or performing any service related to zoos, aquariums, and wildlife preservation and display facilities;

(d) Fix rates and charges for the use of those facilities;

(e) Sue and be sued in its corporate capacity in all courts and in all proceedings.

[ 1999 c 104 s 3.]